src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 207K1
 +Inf:%>yde # ;
 +Inf:%>yda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yder # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ydas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ydde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ydt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ydt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ydd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ydde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ydde # ;
 +Adj:%>ydande # ;
 +Imp:%>yd # ;

LEXICON 208
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 208K1
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 208K2
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 208KL
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 209
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 209K1
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 209K2
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 209KL
 +Inf:%>oe # ;
 +Inf:%>oa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>oast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>oande # ;
 +Imp:%>o # ;

LEXICON 210
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 210K1
 +Inf:%>e # ;
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>d # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>de # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>de # ;
 +Adj:%>ande # ;
 +Imp:%> # ;

LEXICON 212
 +Inf:%>y # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yr # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ygast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>aug # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ogi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ogi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ogen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ogi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj:%>ygande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 212K1
 +Inf:%>y # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yr # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ygas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>aug # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ogi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ogi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ogen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ogi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj:%>ygande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 213
 +Inf:%>y # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yr # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ygast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>aug # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oge # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oge # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ogen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj:%>ygande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 213G
 +Inf:%>y # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ygast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>aug # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oge # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oge # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ogen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj:%>ygande # ;
 +Imp:%>yg # ;

LEXICON 213K1
 +Inf:%>y # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yr # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ygas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>aug # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oge # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oge # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ogen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ogi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ogne # ;
 +Adj:%>ygande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 215
 +Inf:%>ye # ;
 +Inf:%>ya # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>yast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ye # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>y # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>y # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>y # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ye # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ye # ;
 +Adj:%>yande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 215K1
 +Inf:%>ye # ;
 +Inf:%>ya # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>yas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ye # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>y # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>y # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>y # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ye # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ye # ;
 +Adj:%>yande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 216
 +Inf:%>ye # ;
 +Inf:%>ya # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>yast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ye # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>yt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>yt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>y # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ye # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ye # ;
 +Adj:%>yande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 216K1
 +Inf:%>ye # ;
 +Inf:%>ya # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>yas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ye # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>yt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>yt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>y # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ye # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ye # ;
 +Adj:%>yande # ;
 +Imp:%>y # ;

LEXICON 218
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 218K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 218K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 218KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 219
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 219K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 219K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 219KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 222
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>je # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 222K1
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>je # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;
