src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
beinfly+V:beinfl 213G ; ! LEMMA_ID=6006
blekke+V:bl 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=7823
brydde+V:bryd 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=10743
bælfly+V:bælfl 213 ; ! LEMMA_ID=12040
degge+V:deg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=13484
dette+V:d 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=13901
einlyde+V:einlyd 215 ; ! LEMMA_ID=17134
finhogge+V:finh 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=21409
fly+V:fl 213 ; ! LEMMA_ID=23240
gleppe+V:gl 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31132
glette+V:gl 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31139
glygge+V:glyg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31321
gnelle+V:gn 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31466
gnette+V:gn 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31474
grovhogge+V:grovh 209 ; ! LEMMA_ID=32749
halshogge+V:halsh 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34396
hogge+V:h 209 ; ! LEMMA_ID=37716
hygge+V:hyg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=39000
kanthogge+V:kanth 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=44767
klekke+V:kl 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=47209
klette+V:kl 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=47389
knekke+V:kn 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48161
knette+V:kn 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48200
kravellbygge+V:kravellbyg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=50679
kreppe+V:kr 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=50797
kvekke+V:kv 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=52649
kvelle+V:kv 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=52729
kveppe+V:kv 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=52775
lyde+V:lyd 216 ; ! LEMMA_ID=56132
overskygge+V:overskyg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68364
rekke+V:r 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=74157
skamhogge+V:skamh 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81280
skrelle+V:skr 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=83624
skreppe+V:skr 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=83669
skvette+V:skv 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84775
skygge+V:skyg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84829
sleppe+V:sl 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=85582
slettbygge+V:slettbyg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=85602
slette+V:sl 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=85609
smelle+V:sm 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86181
smette+V:sm 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86224
spenne+V:sp 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=88254
sprekke+V:spr 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=88715
sprette+V:spr 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=88774
steinhogge+V:steinh 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=89597
strekke+V:str 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=90784
svelle+V:sv 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92665
topphogge+V:topph 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=97631
trygge+V:tryg 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=99831
tverre+V:tv 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=101122
vassfly+V:vassfl 213G ; ! LEMMA_ID=108086
velle+V:v 219 ; ! LEMMA_ID=109084
ydde+V:yd 210 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113074
glidefly+V:glidefl 213G ; ! LEMMA_ID=136629
